Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 144C.5, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: The Except as provided in subsection 4, the right to control final disposition of a decedentâs remains or to make arrangements for the ceremony after a decedentâs death vests in and devolves upon the following persons who are competent adults at the time of the decedentâs death, in the following order: Sec. 2. Section 144C.5, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 4. The right to control final disposition of a decedentâs remains or to make arrangements for the ceremony after a decedentâs death shall not vest in or devolve upon a person who is prohibited from acting as a designee pursuant to section 144C.8. Sec. 3. Section 144C.8, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 144C.8 Forfeiture of designeeâs authority to control . A designee or person with the authority to control under this chapter shall forfeit all rights and authority under a declaration , or by operation of section 144C.5, and all rights and authority under the declaration , or by operation of section 144C.5, shall vest in and devolve upon an alternate designee, House File 363, p. 2 or if there is none, vest in and devolve pursuant to section 144C.5 , under either of the following circumstances: 1. The designee or person with the authority to control under this chapter is charged with murder in the first or second degree or voluntary manslaughter in connection with the declarantâs death and those charges are known to a third party. 2. The designee or person with the authority to control under this chapter does not exercise the designeeâs authority under the declaration within twenty-four hours of receiving notification of the death of the declarant or within forty hours of the declarantâs death, whichever is earlier. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 363, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor